Washington statutes.
RCW 42.52.575

Information about scholarship opportunities.

This chapter does not prohibit the department of labor and industries from providing information about scholarship opportunities offered by nonprofit organizations and available to children and spouses of workers who suffered an injury in the course of employment resulting in death or permanent total disability. The department of labor and industries may, in its sole discretion, provide information about one or more scholarship opportunities. The cost of printing and inserting materials, any additional mailing costs, and any other related costs must be borne by the scholarship organization.

[ 2013 c 134 s 1.]